District of Columbia statutes.
8-102.04

Rules; enforcement and penalties for violation.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter within 90 days after September 23, 2009.

(b)

(1)

If the Mayor determines that a violation has occurred, the retail establishment shall be liable for the fees under § 8-102.03(a) and the Mayor shall impose a penalty on the retail establishment. The penalty shall be a class 4 infraction under the Schedule of Fines in section 3201 of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (16 DCMR § 3201), pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.]. Adjudication of any infraction shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.].

(2)

No more than one penalty shall be imposed upon a retail establishment within a 7-day period.

(c)

If payment of any amounts due under this section is not received on or before the due date, a penalty shall be added as the Mayor provides by rule.

(d)

Revenues collected through citations for violation of this subchapter shall be used only for enforcement costs, including hiring inspectors and other staff, and administrative costs associated with enforcement of this subchapter.

History

Sept. 23, 2009, D.C. Law 18-55, § 5, 56 DCR 5703
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 6032(b), 58 DCR 6226
Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-188, § 2(a), 59 DCR 10151

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-102.02.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-21, in subsec. (b)(2)(A), substituted “warning” for “warning in a calendar year”; and, in subsecs. (b)(2)(B) and (C), substituted “violation” for “violation in the same calendar year”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-188 rewrote (b).